New York, session 2025-2026, S10601.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 7 of section 64 of the alcoholic beverage 2 control law is amended by adding a new paragraph (e-18) to read as 3 follows: 4 (e-18) Notwithstanding the provisions of paragraph (a) of this subdi- 5 vision, the authority may issue a retail license for on-premises 6 consumption for a premises which shall be located within two hundred 7 feet of a building occupied as a church, synagogue or other place of 8 worship, provided such premises constitutes a premises for the sale of 9 food or beverages at retail for consumption on the premises located 10 wholly within the boundaries of the county of Orange, bounded and 11 described as follows: 12 All that certain tract, piece or parcel of land, situate, lying and 13 being in the village of Walden, town of Montgomery, county of Orange and 14 state of New York, bounded and described as follows: 15 Commencing at the intersection of the southernly line of West Main St- 16 reet with the westerly line of Walnut Street at the point forty one 17 degrees, thirty three minutes, thirty eight point five seconds North and 18 seventy four degrees, eleven minutes, twenty four point two seconds West 19 (41°33'38.5" N, 74°11'24.2" W); 20 Running thence southernly along the westerly side of Walnut Street ni- 21 nety (90') feet more or less to the point forty one degrees, thirty 22 three minutes, thirty seven point sixty five seconds North and seventy 23 four degrees, eleven minutes, twenty four point two seconds West 24 (41°33'37.65" N, 74°11'24.2" W); 25 Thence westerly parallel with West Main Street fifty nine (59') feet 26 more or less to the point forty one degrees, thirty three minutes, thir- EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD04968-03-6 S. 10601 2 1 ty seven point sixty five seconds North and seventy four degrees, eleven 2 minutes, twenty four point nine seconds West (41°33'37.65" N, 3 74°11'24.9" W); 4 Thence northerly parallel with Walnut Street ninety (90') feet more or 5 less to the point forty one degrees, thirty three minutes, thirty eight 6 point five seconds North and seventy four degrees, eleven minutes, twen- 7 ty five West (41°33'37.65" N, 74°11'25" W); 8 Thence easterly along the southerly side of West Main Street fifty 9 nine (59') feet more or less to the corner, the point or place of begin- 10 ning. Said premises known as 79 West Main Street, Walden, New York. 11 Being and intended to be the same premises described in a deed from 12 Wolfe Myrna to Godinez Reinaldo dated January 9th, 2023 and recorded 13 with the Orange County Clerk's Office on February 24th, 2023, Document 14 Number 15384-1710. 15 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately.